Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.380

Land surveys—Record of surveys.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, the board of county commissioners shall cause to be recorded in a suitable book all surveys except such as are made for a temporary purpose. The record book shall be so constructed as to have one page for diagrams to be numbered progressively and the opposite page for notes and remarks; no diagram shall be so constructed as to scale less than one inch to twenty chains.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.32.380. Prior: 1895 c 77 s 5; RRS s 4150.]